Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2616.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9-1-51 of the General Laws in Chapter 9-1 entitled "Causes of
Action" is hereby amended to read as follows:
9-1-51. Limitation on actions based on sexual abuse or exploitation of a child.
(a)(1) All claims or causes of action brought against a perpetrator defendant party by any
person for recovery of damages for injury suffered as a result of sexual abuse, including alleging
negligent supervision of a person that sexually abused a minor, or that the defendant's conduct
caused or contributed to the childhood sexual abuse by another person to include, but not be limited
to, wrongful conduct, negligence or default in supervision, hiring, employment, training,
monitoring, or failure to report and/or the concealment of sexual abuse of a child shall be
commenced within the later to expire of:
(i) Thirty-five (35) years of the act alleged to have caused the injury or condition; or
(ii) Seven (7) years from the time the victim discovered or reasonably should have
discovered that the injury or condition was caused by the act.
Provided, however, that the time limit or commencement of such an action under this
section shall be tolled for a child until the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age. For the purposes
of this section, “sexual abuse” shall have the same meaning as in subsection (e) of this section.
(2) All claims or causes A claim or cause of action brought against a non-perpetrator
defendant by any person alleging negligent supervision of a person that sexually abused a minor,

or that the non-perpetrator defendant’s conduct caused or contributed to the childhood sexual abuse
by another person to include, but not be limited to, wrongful conduct, neglect or default in
supervision, hiring, employment, training, monitoring, or failure to report and/or the concealment
of sexual abuse of a child shall be commenced within the later to expire of:
(i) Thirty-five (35) years of the act or acts alleged to have caused an injury or condition to
the minor; or
(ii) Seven (7) years from the time the victim discovered or reasonably should have
discovered that the injury or condition was caused by the act.
Provided, however, that the time limit or commencement of such an action under this
section shall be tolled for a child until the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age.
For purposes of this section “sexual abuse” shall have the same meaning as in subsection
(e) of this section.
(3) As to a perpetrator defendant, any claim or cause of action based on conduct of sexual
abuse may be commenced within the time period enumerated in subsections (a)(1)(i) and (a)(1)(ii)
regardless if the claim was time-barred under previous version of the general laws.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (a)(3) herein, any claim or cause of action based on
conduct of sexual abuse or conduct that caused or contributed to sexual abuse, if the action is not
otherwise time-barred under previous version of the general laws on the effective date of this
section, may be commenced within the time period enumerated in subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) of
this section based on conduct of sexual abuse or conduct that caused or contributed to sexual abuse,
including alleging negligent supervision of a person that sexually abused a minor or that the
defendant's conduct caused or contributed to the childhood sexual abuse by another person to
include, but not be limited to, wrongful conduct, negligence or default in supervision, hiring,
employment, training, monitoring, or failure to report and/or the concealment of sexual abuse of a
child regardless if the claims were time-barred under previous versions of the general laws on the
effective date of this section, may be commenced within the time period enumerated in subsections
(a)(1)(i) and (a)(1)(ii) of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding any other law, a cause of action for damages that involves sexual
conduct or sexual contact with a child, including alleging negligent supervision of a person that
sexually abused a minor, or that the defendant's conduct caused or contributed to the childhood
sexual abuse by another person to include, but not be limited to, wrongful conduct, negligence or
default in supervision, hiring, employment, training, monitoring, or failure to report and/or the
concealment of sexual abuse of a child, and that would be time barred because of an applicable
statute of limitations shall be revived and shall be commenced by no later than June 30, 2028.
LC003649/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

(b) The victim need not establish which act in a series of continuing sexual abuse or
exploitation incidents caused the injury complained of, but may compute the date of discovery from
the date of the last act by the same perpetrator defendant which is part of a common scheme or plan
of sexual abuse or exploitation.
(c) The knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall not be imputed to a person under
the age of eighteen (18) years.
(d) For purposes of this section, “child” means a person under the age of eighteen (18)
years.
(e) As used in this section, “sexual abuse” means any act committed by the defendant
against a complainant who was less than eighteen (18) years of age at the time of the act and which
act would have been a criminal violation of chapter 37 of title 11.
(f) All claims or causes of action made pursuant to this section against the State of Rhode
Island or any political subdivision thereof shall be exempt from the application of prejudgment
interest pursuant to § 9-21-10.
(g) All claims or causes of action made pursuant to this section against the State of Rhode
Island or any political subdivision thereof shall be subject to the limitations of damages set forth in
§§ 9-31-1, 9-31-2, or 9-31-3 and any damages recovered therein shall not exceed the sum of one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
(h) In all actions filed pursuant to § 9-1-51(a)(3), other than those actions filed against the
State of Rhode Island or any political subdivision thereof, in which a verdict is rendered or a
decision made for pecuniary damages, there shall be added by the clerk of the court to the amount
of damages interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum thereon from the date of written
notice of the claim by the claimant or his or her representative to the defendant or the defendant’s
insurer or the filing of the action, whichever comes first.
SECTION 2. Chapter 9-1 of the General Laws entitled "Causes of Action" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
9-1-55. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is
held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter, which
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of
this chapter are declared to be severable.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC003649/SUB A
========
LC003649/SUB A - Page 3 of 4